Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Carrying Concealed Deadly Weapon
Each concealed deadly weapon instructor or instructor trainer who teaches a concealed deadly weapon applicant or concealed deadly weapon instructor class shall supply the Department of Criminal Justice Training with a class roster indicating which students enrolled and successfully completed the class, and which contains the name and address of each student, within five (5) working days of the completion of the class. The information may be sent by mail, facsimile, e-mail, or other method which will result in the receipt of or production of a hard copy of the information. The postmark, facsimile date, or e-mail date shall be considered as the date on which the notice was sent. Concealed deadly weapon class applicant, instructor, and instructor trainer information and records shall be confidential. The department may release to any person or organization the name, address, and telephone number of a concealed deadly weapon instructor or instructor trainer if that instructor or instructor trainer authorizes the release of the information in writing. The department shall include on any application for an instructor or instructor trainer certification a statement that the applicant either does or does not desire the applicant’s name, address, and telephone number to be made public;

An instructor trainer who assists in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon instructor class or concealed deadly weapon applicant class for more than two (2) hours shall be considered as to have taught a class for the purpose of maintaining his or her certification. All class record forms shall include spaces for assistant instructors to sign and certify that they have assisted in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon instructor or concealed deadly weapon class;

An instructor who assists in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon applicant class for more than two (2) hours shall be considered as to have taught a class for the purpose of maintaining his or her license. All class record forms shall include spaces for assistant instructors to sign and certify that they have assisted in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon class;

If the Department of Criminal Justice Training believes that a firearms instructor trainer or certified firearms instructor has not in fact complied with the requirements for teaching a certified firearms instructor or applicant class by not teaching the class as specified in KRS

237.126

, or who has taught an insufficient class as specified in KRS

237.128

, the department shall send to each person who has been listed as successfully completing the concealed deadly weapon applicant class or concealed deadly weapon instructor class a verification form on which the time, date, date of range firing if different from the date on which the class was conducted, location, and instructor of the class is listed by the department and which requires the person to answer “yes” or “no” to specific questions regarding the conduct of the training class. The form shall be completed under oath and shall be returned to the Department of Criminal Justice Training not later than forty-five (45) days after its receipt. A person who fails to complete the form, to sign the form, or to return the form to the Department of Criminal Justice Training within the time frame specified in this section or who, as a result of information on the returned form, is determined by the Department of Criminal Justice Training, following a hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, to not have received the training required by law shall have his or her concealed deadly weapon license revoked by the Department of Kentucky State Police, following a hearing conducted by the Department of Criminal Justice Training pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, at which hearing the person is found to have violated the provisions of this section or who has been found not to have received the training required by law;

The department shall annually, not later than December 31 of each year, report to the Legislative Research Commission:

The number of firearms instructor trainers and certified firearms instructors whose certifications were suspended, revoked, denied, or who were otherwise disciplined;

The reasons for the imposition of suspensions, revocations, denials, or other discipline; and

Suggestions for improvement of the concealed deadly weapon applicant training program and instructor process;

If a concealed deadly weapon license holder is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or enters an Alford plea to a felony offense, then his or her concealed deadly weapon license shall be forthwith revoked by the Department of Kentucky State Police as a matter of law;

If a concealed deadly weapon instructor or instructor trainer is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or enters an Alford plea to a felony offense, then his or her concealed deadly weapon instructor certification or concealed deadly weapon instructor trainer certification shall be revoked by the Department of Criminal Justice Training as a matter of law; and

The following shall be in effect:

Action to eliminate the firearms instructor trainer program is prohibited. The program shall remain in effect, and no firearms instructor trainer shall have his or her certification reduced to that of certified firearms instructor;

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall revoke the concealed deadly weapon license of any person who received no firearms training as required by KRS

237.126

and administrative regulations, or who received insufficient training as required by KRS

237.128

and administrative regulations, if the person voluntarily admits nonreceipt of training or admits receipt of insufficient training, or if either nonreceipt of training or receipt of insufficient training is proven following a hearing conducted by the Department of Criminal Justice Training pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 119, § 1, effective October 1, 1996; 1998, ch. 417, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 494, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 136, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 455, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 368, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 565, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 182, § 15, effective March 31, 2005; 2006, ch. 240, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 266, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 96, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 32, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 73, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 120, § 5, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 60, § 1, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2015 ch. 126, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 182, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 4, (2) at 1684.